Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2034.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The board of education of a school district may employ
or accept on a volunteer basis a chaplain to provide support, services and
programs for students as directed by the board of education, the
superintendent or such other administrator designated by the board.
(b) A chaplain employed or volunteering pursuant to this section shall
not be required to obtain any form of teacher license issued by the state
board of education. Such chaplain shall be subject to the same criminal
history records check as required by the board of education of such school
district for all other employees of the district.
(c) No board of education shall employ or accept on a volunteer basis
any person to serve as a chaplain who has been convicted of or adjudicated
for an offense requiring registration as a sex offender pursuant to the
Kansas offender registration act, K.S.A. 22-4901 et seq., and amendments
thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.